Illinois, session 104th, HB513.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Domestic Workers' Bill of Rights Act is 5amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (820 ILCS 182/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Domestic Workers' Bill of Rights Act.9(Source: P.A. 99-758, eff. 1-1-17.)